District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
23 That this act may be cited as the "Health Professional Loan Repayment Emergency
24 Amendment Act of 2026".
25 Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Health Professional Recruitment Program Act of
26 2005, effective March 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-71; D.C. Official Code§ 7-751.01 et seq.),
27 is amended as follows:
28 (a) Section 2(6) (D.C. Official Code § 7-751.01(6)) is amended by striking the
29 phrase "or physician assistants" and inserting the phrase "physician assistants, or certified
30 addiction counselors" in its place.
31 (b) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 7-751.08) is amended as follows:
32 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
33 "(a) Physicians and dentists who are full-time participants in the Program shall be
34 eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $165,000, repaid by the
1

35 Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual repayment amount for each
36 such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director
37 required by section 8.”.
38 (2) Subsection (a-1) is amended to read as follows:
39 “(a-1) Physicians who are full-time participants in the Program and who
40 specialize and practice in obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, or another medical
41 specialty identified by the Director or who sub-specialize and practice in oncology,
42 cardiology, neurology, infectious diseases, pulmonary diseases, nephrology,
43 endocrinology, podiatry, ophthalmology, or another medical sub-specialty identified by
44 the Director shall be eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed
45 $200,000, repaid by the Program for up to 4 years of service; provided, that the
46 participants practice in Ward 7 or 8 for the contractually required number of hours for
47 full-time service. The maximum annual loan repayment amount for each such participant
48 shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director required by
49 section 8.”.
50 (3) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
51 “(b) Other health professionals who are full-time participants in the Program shall
52 be eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $90,000, repaid by the
53 Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual loan repayment amount for
54 each such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the
55 Director required by section 8.”.
56 (4) Subsection (c) is repealed.
57 (5) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
2

58 “(d) Physicians and dentists who are part-time participants in the Program shall be
59 eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $82,000, repaid by the
60 Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual loan repayment amount for
61 each such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the
62 Director required by section 8.”.
63 (6) Subsection (e) is amended to read as follows:
64 “(e) Physicians who are part-time participants in the Program and who specialize
65 and practice in obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, or another medical specialty
66 identified by the Director or who sub-specialize and practice in oncology, cardiology,
67 neurology, infectious diseases, pulmonary diseases, nephrology, endocrinology, podiatry,
68 ophthalmology, or another medical sub-specialty identified by the Director shall be
69 eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $100,000, repaid by the
70 Program for up to 4 years of service; provided, that the participants practice in Ward 7 or
71 8 for the contractually required number of hours for part-time service. The maximum
72 annual loan repayment amount for each such participant shall be set forth in the contract
73 between the participant and the Director required by section 8.”.
74 (7) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
75 “(f) Other health professionals who are part-time participants in the Program shall
76 be eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $45,000, repaid by the
77 Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual loan repayment amount for
78 each such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the
79 Director required by section 8.”.
80 (8) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
3

81 “(g)(1) The Mayor may, by rule, annually increase the maximum total loan
82 repayment amounts set forth in this subsection by the annual percentage increase in the
83 consumer price index.
84 “(2) The Mayor shall, by rule, establish the maximum percentage and
85 maximum dollar amount of a participant’s total debt that may be repaid annually. The
86 maximum annual percentage shall not exceed 30% of the participant’s total debt and the
87 maximum dollar amount shall not exceed 30% of the applicable maximum total loan
88 repayment amount.”.
89 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
90 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as
91 the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures
92 Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-
93 301.47a).
94 Sec. 4. Effective date.
95 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
96 by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for
97 no longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of
98 Columbia in section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
99 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
4

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: June 11, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Healthcare Facilities Amendment Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
May 6, 2026
Conclusion
Funds are not sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year
2027 through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The Department of
Health (DC Health) requires $155,000 in fiscal year 2027 and $642,000 over the financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The bill makes several changes to the regulation and oversight of healthcare providers and facilities
in the District of Columbia. Specifically, the bill:
• Requires1 healthcare providers to report adverse events2 and cybersecurity incidents to DC
Health within 48 hours of their occurrence or discovery;
1 By amending Section 202 of the Medical Malpractice Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C.
Law 16-263; D.C. Official Code § 7-161 et seq.).
2 An adverse event is defined in the bill as a preventable event, occurrence, or situation occurring in or under
the purview of a healthcare provider that results in death or contributes to harm that includes physical,
emotional, or psychological harm that requires major intervention, or impairs the individual’s ability to
perform activities of daily living. The term shall include any other events established by the Mayor through
rulemaking.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Healthcare Facilities Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on May 6, 2026
• Requires3 healthcare providers to submit a root cause analysis and corrective action plan to
DC Health within 45 days of an adverse event;
• Requires4 DC Health to maintain a centralized system to collect and analyze adverse event
data, enabling improved patient safety monitoring and public health responses;
• Requires5 healthcare providers to actively participate with recognized patient safety
organizations and submit annual proof of participation;
• Classifies6 adverse event reports and documents as confidential and protected from legal
discovery, unless court-ordered in a felony case or for regulatory agency use;
• Updates7 the healthcare facility licensure processes allows for periodic fee adjustments, and
imposes stricter penalties for non-compliance, including fines for violations that put patients
at risk;
• Allows8 new assisted living facilities to apply for provisional licenses;
• Updates9 staff training requirements for direct care workers in assisted living facilities
with broader District standards and update licensure and food safety compliance procedures;
• Clarifies10 what constitutes a change in control, ownership, or material change in healthcare
facility operations that triggers certificate of need requirements;
• Incorporates11 applicable federal requirements for participation and standards for health-
insurance and medical-assistance programs as minimum standards for the operation of
health care facilities and agencies in the District;
• Enhances12 the District’s ability to levy fines in a manner commensurate with the severity of
an established violation by a facility or agency that presents an immediate danger to the life
and safety of patients, residents, or clients; and
• Exempts13 healthcare facilities and agencies from certificate of clean hands requirements
during license renewals to prevent abrupt closures that would jeopardize the health and
safety of vulnerable patients and residents.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are not sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year
2027 through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. DC Health requires
$155,000 in fiscal year 2027 and $642,000 over the financial plan to implement the bill.
3 By amending Section 202 of the Medical Malpractice Amendment Act of 2006.
4 Id.
5 Id.
6 Id.
7 Id.
8 By amending The Assisted Living Residence Regulatory Act of 2000, effective June 24, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-
127; D.C. Official Code § 44-101.01 et seq.).
9 Id.
10 By amending The Health Services Planning Program Re-establishment Act of 1996, effective April 9, 1997
(D.C. Law 11-191; D.C. Official Code § 44-401 et seq.).
11 By amending The Health-Care and Community Residence Facility, Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of
1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-501 et seq.).
12 Id.
13 By amending The Clean Hands Before Receiving a License or Permit Act of 1996, effective May 11, 1996
(D.C. Law 11-118; D.C. Official Code § 47-2861 et seq.).
Page 2 of 3

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Healthcare Facilities Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on May 6, 2026
DC Health must hire one Nurse Specialist to conduct inspections that result from an increase in
adverse event reporting. DC Health requires additional investigative capacity to review adverse
event reports and assist with investigations. DC Health already maintains a centralized system to
catalog adverse event reports, so no additional resources are needed to procure one. The Nurse
Specialist salary and fringe benefit costs are $155,000 in fiscal year 2027 and $642,000 over the
financial plan. DC Health can implement the provisions in the bill that do not pertain to adverse event
reporting with existing resources.
Healthcare Facilities Amendment Act of 2026
Total Costs
FY 2027 FY 2028 FY 2029 FY 2030 Total
Salary(a) $125,970 $128,489 $131,059 $133,680 $519,199
Fringe(b) $28,847 $30,116 $31,440 $32,822 $123,225
Total $154,817 $158,605 $162,499 $166,502 $642,423
Table Notes:
(a) Assumes one Grade 11, Step 10 Nurse Specialist and a salary growth rate of two percent.
(b) Assumes fringe rate of 22.9 percent and a fringe growth rate of 2.35 percent.
Page 3 of 3

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: April 7, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Bill, the “Healthcare Facilities Amendment Act of
2026” (AE-26-216)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov